Maryland, session 2026, HB0380.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
11–302.
(e) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, the applicant shall pass ALL
SECTIONS OF EACH PART OF an examination [given] AS REQUIRED by the Board under
this subtitle.
11–304.
(a) An applicant who otherwise qualifies for a license is entitled to be examined
as provided in this section.
[(b) Periodically, but not more often than once every 6 months, the Board shall
give examinations to applicants at the times and places that the Board determines.
(c) The Board shall notify each qualified applicant of the time and place of
examination.]
– 1 –

Ch. 26 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(d)] (B) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the Board shall
determine the subjects, scope, form, and passing [score for examinations administered]
SCORES FOR ALL SECTIONS OF EACH PART OF AN EXAMINATION under this subtitle.
(2) The subjects examined shall include:
(i) The anatomy, physiology, and pathology of the human eye; and
(ii) The use of all instruments used for examination of the human
eye.
(3) The examination may include any subject that relates to optics and
optometry:
(i) Contained in any textbook; or
(ii) Taught at any accredited educational institution that teaches
optics, optometry, and other related subjects.
[(e)] (C) [(1)] An applicant who fails the examination may take the next
regularly scheduled examination.
[(2) The applicant shall pay to the Board a reexamination fee set by the
Board for each reexamination.]
11–305.
(a) Subject to the provisions of this section, the Board may waive the examination
requirements of this title for an individual who is licensed to practice optometry in any
other state.
(b) The Board may grant a waiver under this section only if the applicant:
(1) Pays the application fee required by the Board under § 11–303 of this
subtitle;
(2) Provides adequate evidence that the applicant:
(i) Meets the qualifications otherwise required by this title,
including, for 3 years before applying, the continuing education requirements of the other
state in which the applicant has been practicing optometry, or, if the other state does not
have any continuing education requirement, the applicant shall meet the equivalent of 3
years of the continuing education requirements of this subtitle in courses approved by the
Board;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 26
(ii) Meets the terms and conditions that the Board establishes in
subsections (c) and (d) of this section;
(iii) At the time the applicant was licensed in the other state, was
qualified to take the examination that then was required by the laws of this State; and
(iv) Qualified for a license in the other state by passing an
examination given by the board of optometry in that state;
(3) Presents a copy of the license, certified by the issuing board; and
(4) Has not failed an examination [given] REQUIRED by the Board within
the previous 5 years.
(c) (1) The Board may waive the examination requirements of this subtitle for
an applicant who:
(i) If so required by the Board under subsection (d) of this section,
passes an examination [administered] REQUIRED by the Board; and
(ii) For 3 years immediately before applying, has practiced
optometry actively.
(2) The Board may waive the requirement of practicing optometry actively
for an applicant who for 3 years:
(i) Was teaching optometry;
(ii) Was a uniformed services optometrist;
(iii) Was a supervisor or administrative optometrist; or
(iv) Was a researcher in optometry.
(d) (1) Within 1 year of receipt of an application, the Board may require that
the applicant pass an examination.
(2) The Board shall determine the scope, form, and passing score for
examinations under this section.
11–310.
(a) (1) The Board shall place a licensee on inactive status, if the licensee
submits to the Board:
– 3 –

Ch. 26 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) An application for inactive status on the form required by the
Board; and
(ii) The inactive status fee set by the Board.
(2) THE BOARD MAY NOT PLACE A LICENSEE ON INACTIVE STATUS
FOR MORE THAN 6 CONSECUTIVE YEARS.
[(2)] (3) The Board shall issue a license to an individual who is on inactive
status if the individual:
(i) Meets any continuing education requirements set by the Board;
and
(ii) Pays to the Board the reinstatement fee set by the Board.
(b) The Board may reinstate the license of an optometrist whose license has been
expired for less than 5 years and who has not been put on inactive status, if the optometrist:
(1) Has met the continuing education requirements set by the Board;
(2) Meets the renewal requirements of § 11–308 of this subtitle; and
(3) Pays to the Board the reinstatement fee set by the Board.
(c) The Board may not reinstate the license of an optometrist whose license has
been expired for 5 years or more and who has not been put on inactive status, unless the
optometrist:
(1) Passes ALL SECTIONS OF EACH PART OF an examination
[administered] AS REQUIRED by the Board; and
(2) Otherwise meets the requirements of subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 4 –